North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-03.1 Uniform Controlled Substances Act
19-03.1-22.2.
Endangerment of child or vulnerable adult.

For purposes of this section:

“Chemical substance” means a substance intended to be used as a precursor in the manufacture of a controlled substance or any other chemical intended to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance. Intent under this subsection may be demonstrated by the substance’s use, quantity, manner of storage, or proximity to other precursors or to manufacturing equipment.

“Child” means an individual who is under the age of eighteen years.

“Controlled substance” means the same as that term is defined in section 19-03.1-01, except the term does not include less than one-half ounce [14.175 grams] of marijuana or less than two grams of tetrahydrocannabinol.

“Drug paraphernalia” means the same as that term is defined in section 19-03.4-01.

“Prescription” means the same as that term is described in section 19-03.1-22.

“Vulnerable adult” means a vulnerable adult as the term is defined in section 50-25.2-01.

Unless a greater penalty is otherwise provided by law, a person who knowingly or intentionally causes or permits a child or vulnerable adult to be exposed to, to ingest or inhale, or to have contact with a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia as defined in subsection 1, is guilty of a class C felony.

Unless a greater penalty is otherwise provided by law, a person who violates subsection 2, and a child or vulnerable adult actually suffers bodily injury by exposure to, ingestion of, inhalation of, or contact with a controlled substance, chemical substance, or drug paraphernalia, is guilty of a class B felony unless the exposure, ingestion, inhalation, or contact results in the death of the child or vulnerable adult, in which case the person is guilty of a class A felony.

It is an affirmative defense to a violation of this section that the controlled substance was provided by lawful prescription for the child or vulnerable adult and that it was administered to the child or vulnerable adult in accordance with the prescription instructions provided with the controlled substance.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 183, § 1; 2017, ch. 74, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 172, § 3, effective May 3, 2021.

19-03.1-22.3.
Ingesting a controlled substance — Venue for violation-Penalty.

Except as provided in subsection 2, a person who intentionally ingests, inhales, injects, or otherwise takes into the body a controlled substance, unless the substance was obtained directly from a practitioner or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner’s professional practice, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. This subsection does not apply to ingesting, inhaling, injecting, or otherwise taking into the body marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol.

A person who is under twenty-one years of age and intentionally ingests, inhales, injects, or otherwise takes into the body a controlled substance that is marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol, unless the substance was medical marijuana obtained in accordance with chapter 19-24.1, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

The venue for a violation of this section exists in either the jurisdiction in which the controlled substance was ingested, inhaled, injected, or otherwise taken into the body or the jurisdiction in which the controlled substance was detected in the body of the accused.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 193, § 1; 2017, ch. 108, § 10, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 164, § 5, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 186, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 4, effective May 3, 2021.

19-03.1-22.4.
Controlled substances dispensed by means of the internet.

As used in this section:

“Covering practitioner” means, with respect to a patient, a practitioner who conducts a medical evaluation, other than an in-person medical evaluation, at the request of a practitioner who:

Has conducted at least one in-person medical evaluation of the patient or an evaluation of the patient through the practice of telemedicine, within the previous twenty-four months; and

Is temporarily unavailable to conduct the evaluation of the patient.

“Deliver, distribute, or dispense by means of the internet” refers, respectively, to delivery, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance that is caused or facilitated by means of the internet.

“In-person medical evaluation” means a medical evaluation that is conducted with the patient in the physical presence of the practitioner, without regard to whether portions of the evaluation are conducted by other health professionals.

“Internet” and “practice of telemedicine” have the meanings set forth in the Ryan Haight Online Pharmacy Consumer Protection Act of 2008 [Pub. L. 110-425; 21 U.S.C. 802-803].

“Valid prescription” means a prescription that is issued for a legitimate medical purpose in the usual course of professional practice by a:

Practitioner who has conducted at least one in-person medical evaluation of the patient; or

Covering practitioner.

A controlled substance that is a prescription drug may not be delivered, distributed, or dispensed by means of the internet without a valid prescription, but nothing in this subsection may be construed to imply that one in-person medical evaluation by itself demonstrates that a prescription has been validly issued for a legitimate medical purpose within the usual course of professional practice.

This section applies to the delivery, distribution, and dispensing of a controlled substance by means of the internet from a location whether within or outside this state to a person or an address in this state.

Nothing in this section applies to the delivery, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance by a practitioner engaged in the practice of telemedicine in accordance with applicable federal and state laws.

Nothing in this section may be construed as authorizing, prohibiting, or limiting the use of electronic prescriptions for controlled substances.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 198, § 3.

19-03.1-22.5.
Controlled substance analog use — Venue for violation — Penalty.

The use of controlled substance analog includes the ingestion, inhalation, absorption, or any other method of taking the controlled substance analog into the body. An individual who intentionally uses a controlled substance analog is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for a first offense and a class C felony for a second or subsequent offense, unless the individual obtains the analog directly from a practitioner or pursuant to a valid prescription or order of a practitioner.

The venue for a violation under this section exists in the jurisdiction in which the substance was used or in which the substance was detected.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 183, § 7; 2017, ch. 108, § 11, effective April 21, 2017.

19-03.1-23.
Prohibited acts — Penalties. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for a person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, or to deliver, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance by means of the internet, but a person who violates section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection. A person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A controlled substance classified in schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony.

Any other controlled substance classified in schedule I, II, or III, or a controlled substance analog, except marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B felony.

Marijuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or a substance classified in schedule IV, is guilty of a class C felony.

A substance classified in schedule V, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A prior misdemeanor conviction under subsection 7 or a prior conviction under subsection 3 or 4 of section 19-03.4-03 may not be considered a prior offense under subsection 1.

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, create, deliver, distribute, or dispense a counterfeit substance by means of the internet or any other means, or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance by means of the internet or any other means, but any person who violates section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection. Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class B felony.

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule IV, is guilty of a class C felony.

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule V, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person at least eighteen years of age who solicits, induces, intimidates, employs, hires, or uses a person under eighteen years of age to aid or assist in the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance for the purpose of receiving consideration or payment for the manufacture or delivery of any controlled substance is guilty of a class B felony.

Except for a prior conviction equivalent to a misdemeanor violation of subsection 7 or a prior conviction under subsection 3 or 4 of section 19-03.4-03, a violation of this title or a law of another state or the federal government which is equivalent to an offense with respect to the manufacture, delivery, or intent to deliver a controlled substance under this title committed while the offender was an adult and which resulted in a plea or finding of guilt must be considered a prior offense under subsection 1. The prior offense must be alleged in the complaint, information, or indictment. The plea or finding of guilt for the prior offense must have occurred before the date of the commission of the offense or offenses charged in the complaint, information, or indictment.

It is unlawful for a person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02:

Serve as an agent, intermediary, or other entity that causes the internet to be used to bring together a buyer and seller to engage in the delivery, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance in a manner not authorized by this chapter; or

Offer to fill or refill a prescription for a controlled substance based solely on a consumer’s completion of an online medical questionnaire.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, possess a controlled substance or a controlled substance analog unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner’s professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter, but any person who violates section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the first offense under this subsection and a class C felony for a second or subsequent offense under this subsection.

If, at the time of the offense the person is in or on the real property comprising a public or private elementary or secondary school or a public career and technical education school, the person is guilty of a class B felony, unless the offense involves marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol.

A person who violates this subsection by possessing:

Marijuana:

In an amount of less than one-half ounce [14.175 grams] is guilty of an infraction.

At least one-half ounce [14.175 grams] but not more than 500 grams of marijuana is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

More than 500 grams of marijuana is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Tetrahydrocannabinol:

In an amount less than two grams is guilty of an infraction.

At least two grams but not more than six grams of tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

More than six grams of tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

If an individual is sentenced to the legal and physical custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation under this subsection, the department may place the individual in a drug and alcohol treatment program designated by the department. Upon the successful completion of the drug and alcohol treatment program, the department shall release the individual from imprisonment to begin any court-ordered period of probation.

If the individual is not subject to any court-ordered probation, the court shall order the individual to serve the remainder of the sentence of imprisonment on supervised probation subject to the terms and conditions imposed by the court.

Probation under this subsection may include placement in another facility, treatment program, or drug court. If an individual is placed in another facility or treatment program upon release from imprisonment, the remainder of the sentence must be considered as time spent in custody.

An individual incarcerated under this subsection as a result of a second probation revocation is not eligible for release from imprisonment upon the successful completion of treatment.

A person who violates this subsection regarding possession of five or fewer capsules, pills, or tablets of a schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance or controlled substance analog is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Except as provided by section 19-03.1-45, a court may order a person who violates this chapter or chapter 19-03.4 to undergo a drug addiction evaluation by a licensed addiction counselor. The evaluation must indicate the prospects for rehabilitation and whether addiction treatment is required. If ordered, the evaluation must be submitted to the court before imposing punishment for a felony violation or a misdemeanor violation.

If a person pleads guilty or is found guilty of a first offense regarding possession of one ounce [28.35 grams] or less of marijuana or two grams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol and a judgment of guilt is entered, a court, upon motion, shall seal the court record of that conviction if the person is not subsequently convicted within two years of a further violation of this chapter. Once sealed, the court record may not be opened even by order of the court.

Upon successful completion of a drug court program, a person who has been convicted of a felony under this section and sentenced to drug court is deemed to have been convicted of a misdemeanor.

If a person convicted of a misdemeanor under this section is sentenced to drug court and successfully completes a drug court program, the court shall dismiss the case and seal the file in accordance with section 12.1-32-07.2.

It is not a defense to a violation of this subsection that the defendant did not know the age of a person protected under this subsection.

A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 23; 1973, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 106, § 168; 1975, ch. 110, §§ 9 to 11; 1979, ch. 172, § 28; 1979, ch. 187, § 29; 1979, ch. 287, § 4; 1983, ch. 255, § 1; 1989, ch. 267, § 1; 1993, ch. 128, § 3; 1995, ch. 120, § 18; 1997, ch. 131, § 3; 1997, ch. 205, § 1; 1999, ch. 16, § 7; 2001, ch. 214, § 4; 2001, ch. 215, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 70; 2005, ch. 196, § 2; 2007, ch. 210, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2009, ch. 198, § 4; 2011, ch. 162, § 1; 2013, ch. 183, §§ 5, 6; 2015, ch. 170, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 108, § 12, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 164, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 165, §§
1, 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 186, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 187, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 188, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 172, § 5, effective May 3, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 170, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 19-03.1-23 was amended 4 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 110, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2246; Section 2 of Chapter 176, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2264; Section 5 of Chapter 172, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1213; and Section 3 of Chapter 175, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2283.

Section 19-03.1-23 was amended 3 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 2 of Chapter 188, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1164; Section 3 of Chapter 186, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1050; and Section 2 of Chapter 187, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1183.

Section 19-03.1-23 was amended 4 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Sections 1 and 2 of Chapter 165, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1341; Section 12 of Chapter 108, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1041; Section 6 of Chapter 164, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1269.

Cross-References.

Giving alcoholic beverages to prisoner, see N.D.C.C. § 12-44.1-21.

Penitentiary, alcoholic beverages and controlled substances prohibited, see N.D.C.C. § 12-47-21.

Youth correctional center, prohibition on delivery or possession of alcoholic beverages or controlled substances to or by students, see N.D.C.C. § 12-46-24.

Formula for Controlled Substance.

Where no methamphetamine was found in search of the premises or the search of defendant, the recipe for that substance found on defendant’s person was relevant to show the identity of the controlled substance that he allegedly injected into another person. State v. Raywalt, 444 N.W.2d 688, 1989 N.D. LEXIS 161 (N.D. 1989).

19-03.1-23.
Prohibited acts — Penalties. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for a person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, manufacture, deliver, or possess with intent to manufacture or deliver, a controlled substance, or to deliver, distribute, or dispense a controlled substance by means of the internet, but a person who violates section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection. A person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A controlled substance classified in schedule I or II which is a narcotic drug, or methamphetamine, is guilty of a class B felony.

Any other controlled substance classified in schedule I, II, or III, or a controlled substance analog, except marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B felony.

Marijuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or a substance classified in schedule IV, is guilty of a class C felony.

A substance classified in schedule V, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A prior misdemeanor conviction under subsection 7 or a prior conviction under subsection 3 or 4 of section 19-03.4-03 may not be considered a prior offense under subsection 1.

Except as authorized by this chapter, it is unlawful for any person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, create, deliver, distribute, or dispense a counterfeit substance by means of the internet or any other means, or possess with intent to deliver, a counterfeit substance by means of the internet or any other means, but any person who violates section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection. Any person who violates this subsection with respect to:

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule I, II, or III, is guilty of a class B felony.

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule IV, is guilty of a class C felony.

A counterfeit substance classified in schedule V, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

A person at least eighteen years of age who solicits, induces, intimidates, employs, hires, or uses a person under eighteen years of age to aid or assist in the manufacture, delivery, or possession with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance for the purpose of receiving consideration or payment for the manufacture or delivery of any controlled substance is guilty of a class B felony. It is not a defense to a violation of this subsection that the defendant did not know the age of a person protected under this subsection.

Except for a prior conviction equivalent to a misdemeanor violation of subsection 7 or a prior conviction under subsection 3 or 4 of section 19-03.4-03, a violation of this title or a law of another state or the federal government which is equivalent to an offense with respect to the manufacture, delivery, or intent to deliver a controlled substance under this title committed while the offender was an adult and which resulted in a plea or finding of guilt must be considered a prior offense under subsection 1. The prior offense must be alleged in the complaint, information, or indictment. The plea or finding of guilt for the prior offense must have occurred before the date of the commission of the offense or offenses charged in the complaint, information, or indictment.

It is unlawful for a person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02:

Serve as an agent, intermediary, or other entity that causes the internet to be used to bring together a buyer and seller to engage in the delivery, distribution, or dispensing of a controlled substance in a manner not authorized by this chapter; or

Offer to fill or refill a prescription for a controlled substance based solely on a consumer’s completion of an online medical questionnaire.

It is unlawful for any person to willfully, as defined in section 12.1-02-02, possess a controlled substance or a controlled substance analog unless the substance was obtained directly from, or pursuant to, a valid prescription or order of a practitioner while acting in the course of the practitioner’s professional practice, or except as otherwise authorized by this chapter, but any person who violates section 12-46-24 or 12-47-21 may not be prosecuted under this subsection.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class A misdemeanor for the first offense under this subsection and a class C felony for a second or subsequent offense under this subsection.

If, at the time of the offense the person is in or on the real property comprising a public or private elementary or secondary school or a public career and technical education school, the person is guilty of a class B felony, unless the offense involves marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol.

A person who violates this subsection by possessing:

Marijuana:

In an amount of less than one-half ounce [14.175 grams] is guilty of an infraction.

At least one-half ounce [14.175 grams] but not more than 500 grams of marijuana is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

More than 500 grams of marijuana is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Tetrahydrocannabinol:

In an amount less than two grams is guilty of an infraction.

At least two grams but not more than six grams of tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

More than six grams of tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

If an individual is sentenced to the legal and physical custody of the department of corrections and rehabilitation under this subsection, the department may place the individual in a drug and alcohol treatment program designated by the department. Upon the successful completion of the drug and alcohol treatment program, the department shall release the individual from imprisonment to begin any court-ordered period of probation.

If the individual is not subject to any court-ordered probation, the court shall order the individual to serve the remainder of the sentence of imprisonment on supervised probation subject to the terms and conditions imposed by the court.

Probation under this subsection may include placement in another facility, treatment program, drug court, or veterans treatment docket. If an individual is placed in another facility or treatment program upon release from imprisonment, the remainder of the sentence must be considered as time spent in custody.

An individual incarcerated under this subsection as a result of a second probation revocation is not eligible for release from imprisonment upon the successful completion of treatment.

A person who violates this subsection regarding possession of five or fewer capsules, pills, or tablets of a schedule II, III, IV, or V controlled substance or controlled substance analog is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Except as provided by section 19-03.1-45, a court may order a person who violates this chapter or chapter 19-03.4 to undergo a drug addiction evaluation by a licensed addiction counselor. The evaluation must indicate the prospects for rehabilitation and whether addiction treatment is required. If ordered, the evaluation must be submitted to the court before imposing punishment for a felony violation or a misdemeanor violation.

If a person pleads guilty or is found guilty of a first offense regarding possession of one ounce [28.35 grams] or less of marijuana or two grams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol and a judgment of guilt is entered, a court, upon motion, shall seal the court record of that conviction if the person is not subsequently convicted within two years of a further violation of this chapter. Once sealed, the court record may not be opened even by order of the court.

Upon successful completion of a drug court program or veterans treatment docket, a person who has been convicted of a felony under this section and sentenced to drug court or veterans treatment docket is deemed to have been convicted of a misdemeanor.

If a person convicted of a misdemeanor under this section is sentenced to drug court or veterans treatment docket and successfully completes a drug court program or veterans treatment docket, the court shall dismiss the case and seal the file in accordance with section 12.1-32-07.2.

If an individual under the age of twenty-one pleads guilty or is found guilty of a first offense regarding possession of one-half ounce [14.175 grams] or less of marijuana, the court also may sentence the individual to an evidence-based alcohol and drug education program operated under rules adopted by the department of human services under section 50-06-44. For a second or subsequent offense regarding possession of one-half ounce [14.175 grams] or less of marijuana, the court also shall sentence the individual to an evidence-based alcohol and drug education program operated under rules adopted by the department of human services under section 50-06-44 .

A person who violates this subsection is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 23; 1973, ch. 199, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 106, § 168; 1975, ch. 110, §§ 9 to 11; 1979, ch. 172, § 28; 1979, ch. 187, § 29; 1979, ch. 287, § 4; 1983, ch. 255, § 1; 1989, ch. 267, § 1; 1993, ch. 128, § 3; 1995, ch. 120, § 18; 1997, ch. 131, § 3; 1997, ch. 205, § 1; 1999, ch. 16, § 7; 2001, ch. 214, § 4; 2001, ch. 215, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 70; 2005, ch. 196, § 2; 2007, ch. 210, § 1; 2007, ch. 211, § 1; 2009, ch. 198, § 4; 2011, ch. 162, § 1; 2013, ch. 183, §§ 5, 6; 2015, ch. 170, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 108, § 12, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 164, § 6, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 165, §§
1, 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 186, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 187, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 188, § 2, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 110, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 172, § 5, effective May 3, 2021; 2021, ch. 175, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 176, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

19-03.1-23.1.
Increased penalties for aggravating factors in drug offenses.

A person who violates section 19-03.1-23 is subject to the penalties provided in subsection 2 if:

The offense was committed during a school sponsored activity or was committed during the hours of six a.m. to ten p.m. if school is in session, the offense involved the manufacture, delivery, or possession, with intent to manufacture or deliver a controlled substance in, on, or within three hundred feet [91.4 meters] of the real property comprising a preschool facility, a public or private elementary or secondary school, or a public career and technical education school, the defendant was at least twenty-one years of age at the time of the offense, and the offense involved the delivery of a controlled substance to a minor;

The offense involved:

Fifty grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of heroin;

Fifty grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of:

Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives of ecgonine or their salts have been removed;

Cocaine, its salts, optical and geometric isomers, and salts of isomers;

Ecgonine, its derivatives, their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers; or

Any compound, mixture, or preparation that contains any quantity of any of the substance referred to in subparagraphs a through c;

Twenty-eight grams or more of a mixture or substance described in paragraph 2 which contains cocaine base;

Ten grams or more of phencyclidine or one hundred grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of phencyclidine;

One gram, one hundred dosage units, or one-half liquid ounce or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of lysergic acid diethylamide;

Forty grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide or ten grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of any analog of N-phenyl-N-[1-(2-phenylethyl)-4-piperidinyl] propanamide;

Fifty grams or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of methamphetamine;

Ten grams, one hundred dosage units, or one-half liquid ounce or more of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of 3,4-methylenedioxy-N-methylamphetamine, C11H15NO2;

One hundred dosage units or one-half liquid ounce of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of gamma-hydroxybutyrate or gamma-butyrolactone or 1,4 butanediol or any substance that is an analog of gamma-hydroxybutyrate; or

One hundred dosage units or one-half liquid ounce of a mixture or substance containing a detectable amount of flunitrazepam; or

The defendant had a firearm in the defendant’s actual possession at the time of the offense.

The defendant sells, distributes, delivers, or conspires to deliver a controlled substance to an individual which results in the death of the individual due to the use of that controlled substance and the death of the individual would not have occurred in the absence of the defendant’s conduct. This subdivision does not apply to an individual who is immune from prosecution under section 19-03.1-23.4.

The offense is:

A class A felony if the violation of section 19-03.1-23 is designated as a class B felony.

A class B felony if the violation of section 19-03.1-23 is designated as a class C felony.

A class C felony if the violation of section 19-03.1-23 is designated as a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 399, § 6; 2001, ch. 216, § 1; 2003, ch. 138, § 71; 2005, ch. 194, § 1; 2011, ch. 162, § 2; 2011, ch. 163, § 1; 2017, ch. 108, § 13, effective April 21, 2017; 2017, ch. 167, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 164, § 7, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 165, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 175, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 177, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 19-03.1-23.1 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 177, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1287; and Section 4 of Chapter 175, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2283.

Section 19-03.1-23.1 was amended 4 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 165, Session Law 2017, House Bill 1341; Section 1 of Chapter 167, Session Law 2017, House Bill 1270; Section 13 of Chapter 108, Session Law 2017, House Bill 1041; and Section 7 of Chapter 164, Session Laws 2017, House Bill 1269.

19-03.1-23.2.
Mandatory terms of imprisonment — Deferred or suspended sentence limited. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 128, § 4; 2001, ch. 214, § 5; 2001, ch. 215, § 2; repealed by 2019, ch. 187, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

19-03.1-23.3.
Drug currency forfeiture.

There is a presumption of forfeiture for money, coin, currency, and everything of value, furnished or intended to be furnished, in exchange for a controlled substance in violation of chapter 19-03.1 or imitation controlled substance in violation of chapter 19-03.2, if the state offers a reasonable basis to believe, based on the following circumstances, that there is a substantial connection between the property and an offense listed in chapter 19-03.1 or 19-03.2:

The property at issue is currency in excess of ten thousand dollars which, at the time of seizure, was being transported through an airport, on a highway, or at a port-of-entry, and the property was packaged or concealed in a highly unusual manner, the person transporting the property provided false information to any law enforcement officer who lawfully stopped the person for investigative purposes, the property was found in close proximity to a measurable quantity of any controlled substance, or the property was the subject of a positive alert by a properly trained dog;

The property at issue was acquired during a period of time when the person who acquired the property was engaged in an offense under chapter 19-03.1 or 19-03.2 or within a reasonable time after the period, and there is no likely source for the property other than that offense;

The property at issue was, or was intended to be, transported, transmitted, or transferred to or from a major drug-transit country, a major illicit drug-producing country, or a major money-laundering country, and the transaction giving rise to the forfeiture:

Occurred in part in a state or foreign country whose bank secrecy laws render this state unable to obtain records relating to the transaction; or

Was conducted by, to, or through a corporation that does not conduct any ongoing and significant commercial or manufacturing business or any other form of commercial operation which was not engaged in any legitimate business activity; or

A person involved in the transaction giving rise to the forfeiture action has been convicted in a federal, state, or foreign jurisdiction of an offense equivalent to an offense under chapter 19-03.1 or 19-03.2 or a felony involving money laundering, or is a fugitive from prosecution for any of these offenses.

The presumption in this section does not preclude the use of other presumptions or the establishment of probable cause based on criteria other than those set forth in this section.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 215, § 1.

19-03.1-23.4.
Overdose prevention and immunity.

An individual is immune from criminal prosecution under sections 19-03.1-22.1, 19-03.1-22.3, 19-03.1-22.5, subsection 7 of section 19-03.1-23, subsection 3 of section 19-03.2-03, and section 19-03.4-03 if in good faith that individual seeks medical assistance for another individual in need of emergency medical assistance due to a drug overdose. To receive immunity under this section, the individual receiving immunity must have remained on the scene until assistance arrived, cooperated with the medical treatment of the reported drug overdosed individual, and the overdosed individual must have been in a condition a layperson would reasonably believe to be a drug overdose requiring immediate medical assistance. Neither the individual who experiences a drug-related overdose and is in need of emergency medical assistance nor the cooperating individual seeking medical assistance may be charged or prosecuted for the criminal offenses listed in this section or for the sharing of controlled substances among those present. Immunity from prosecution under this section does not apply unless the evidence for the charge or prosecution was obtained as a result of the drug-related overdose and the need for emergency medical assistance. Good faith does not include seeking medical assistance during the course of the execution of an arrest warrant or search warrant or during a lawful search.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 172, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 164, § 8, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 187, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2015.

19-03.1-24.
Prohibited acts B — Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person:

Who is subject to the provisions of sections 19-03.1-15 through 19-03.1-22 to distribute or dispense a controlled substance in violation of section 19-03.1-22;

Who is a registrant, to manufacture a controlled substance not authorized by their registration, or to distribute or dispense a controlled substance not authorized by their registration to another registrant or other authorized person;

To refuse or fail to make, keep, or furnish any record, notification, order form, statement, invoice, or information required under this chapter;

To refuse an entry into any premises for any inspection authorized by this chapter; or

Knowingly to keep or maintain any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling, building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or other structure or place, which is resorted to by persons using controlled substances in violation of this chapter for the purpose of using these substances, or which is used for keeping or selling them in violation of this chapter.

Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class C felony.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 235, § 24; 1975, ch. 106, § 169; 1985, ch. 258, § 21.